Illinois, session 104th, SB509.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Creative Recovery Grant Program 5Act is amended by changing Section 40-1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 709/40-1)7    Sec. 40-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the Illinois Creative Recovery Grant Program Act. References 9in this Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22.)